District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.64

Transfers.

By October 5, 2014, the District of Columbia Department of Human Resources, in collaboration with the Office of the Attorney General, shall transfer to the subordinate agencies, all attorney and support staff employees, personal property, full-time equivalent position authority, assets, records, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the furnishing of legal and other services by the attorneys who perform work primarily as or for the General Counsels of the subordinate agencies as of October 1, 2014.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 864
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3012(j), 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(k), 60 DCR 15487
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 1012(c), 1014(a)(3), 61 DCR 9990

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote the section which read “By October 1, 2005, all subordinate agencies, other than the Office of the Attorney General, shall transfer to that Office all attorney and support staff employees, personal property, full-time equivalent position authority, assets, records, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the furnishing of legal and other services by the attorneys who were employed by these agencies as of October 20, 2005.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155, § 1012, substituted “October 1, 2018” for “October 1, 2014” twice.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014, substituted “2014” for “2018” twice.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3012(j) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).